Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-288
Limited partner; assignee; right of action.

A limited partner or an assignee of a limited partner may bring an action in the name of a limited partnership to recover a judgment in its favor if general partners with authority to do so have refused to bring the action or if an effort to cause those general partners to bring the action is not likely to succeed.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 56;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 58.